Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.080

Transactions in state trust company shares.

(1) A state trust company may acquire its own shares if:

(a) The amount of its capital is sufficient to fully absorb the acquisition of the shares under regulatory accounting principles; or

(b) The state trust company obtains the prior written approval of the director.

(2) A state trust company may acquire a lien upon its own shares if:

(a) The aggregate amount of indebtedness so secured is less than the amount of the state trust company's capital; or

(b) The state trust company obtains the prior written approval of the director.

[ 2014 c 37 s 310.]